Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5818.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.17.420 and 2019 c 440 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW 43.330.510, 43.10.310, 43.17.425, 10.93.160, and 43.10.315, section 3 of this act, and sections 8 and 9, chapter 440, Laws of 2019 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Civil immigration warrant" means any warrant for a violation of federal civil immigration law issued by a federal immigration authority. A "civil immigration warrant" includes, but is not limited to, administrative warrants issued on forms I-200 or I-203, or their successors, and civil immigration warrants entered in the national crime information center database.(2) "Court order" means a directive issued by a judge or magistrate under the authority of Article III of the United States Constitution or Article IV of the Washington Constitution. A "court order" includes but is not limited to warrants and subpoenas.(3) "Federal immigration authority" means any officer, employee, or person otherwise paid by or acting as an agent of the United States department of homeland security including but not limited to its subagencies, immigration and customs enforcement and customs and border protection, and any present or future divisions thereof, charged with immigration enforcement.(4) "Health facility" has the same meaning as the term "health care facility" provided in RCW 70.175.020, and includes substance abuse treatment facilities.(5) "Hold request" or "immigration detainer request" means a request from a federal immigration authority, without a court order, that a state or local law enforcement agency maintain custody of an individual currently in its custody beyond the time he or she would otherwise be eligible for release in order to facilitate transfer to a federal immigration authority. A "hold request" or "immigration detainer request" includes, but is not limited to, department of homeland security form I-247A or prior or subsequent versions of form I-247.(6) "Immigration detention agreement" means any contract, agreement, intergovernmental service agreement, or memorandum of understanding that permits a state or local law enforcement agency to house or detain individuals for federal civil immigration violations.(7) "Immigration or citizenship status" means as such status has been established to such individual under the immigration and nationality act.(8) "Language services" includes but is not limited to translation, interpretation, training, or classes. Translation means written communication from one language to another while preserving the intent and essential meaning of the original text. Interpretation means transfer of an oral communication from one language to another.(9) "Local government" means any governmental entity other than the state, federal agencies, or an operating system established under chapter 43.52 RCW. It includes, but is not limited to, cities, counties, school districts, and special purpose districts.(10) "Local law enforcement agency" means any agency of a city, county, special district, or other political subdivision of the state that is a general authority Washington law enforcement agency, as defined by RCW 10.93.020, or that is authorized to operate jails or to maintain custody of individuals in jails; or to operate juvenile detention facilities or to maintain custody of individuals in juvenile detention facilities; or to monitor compliance with probation or parole conditions.(11) "Notification request" means a request from a federal immigration authority that a state or local law enforcement agency inform a federal immigration authority of the release date and time in advance of the release of an individual in its custody. "Notification request" includes, but is not limited to, the department of homeland security's form I-247A, form I-247N, or prior or subsequent versions of such forms.(12) "Physical custody of the department of corrections" means only those individuals detained in a state correctional facility but does not include minors detained pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW, or individuals in community custody as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.(13) "Public schools" means all public elementary and secondary schools under the jurisdiction of local governing boards or a charter school board and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.(14) "School resource officer" means a commissioned law enforcement officer in the state of Washington with sworn authority to uphold the law and assigned by the employing police department or sheriff's office to work in schools to ensure school safety. By building relationships with students, school resource officers work alongside school administrators and staff to help students make good choices. School resource officers are encouraged to focus on keeping students out of the criminal justice system when possible and not impose criminal sanctions in matters that are more appropriately handled within the educational system.(15) "State agency" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 42.56.010.(16) "State law enforcement agency" means any agency of the state of Washington that:(a) Is a general authority Washington law enforcement agency as defined by RCW 10.93.020;(b) Is authorized to operate prisons or to maintain custody of individuals in prisons; or(c) Is authorized to operate juvenile detention facilities or to maintain custody of individuals in juvenile detention facilities.Sec. 2. RCW 10.93.160 and 2019 c 440 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The definitions contained in RCW 43.17.420 apply to this section.(2) The legislature finds that it is not the primary purpose of state and local law enforcement agencies or school resource officers to enforce civil federal immigration law. The legislature further finds that the immigration status of an individual or an individual's presence in, entry, or reentry to, or employment in the United States alone, is not a matter for police action, and that United States federal immigration authority has primary jurisdiction for enforcement of the provisions of Title 8 U.S.C. dealing with illegal entry.(3) School resource officers, when acting in their official capacity as a school resource officer, may not:(a) Inquire into or collect information about an individual's immigration or citizenship status, or place of birth; or(b) Provide information pursuant to notification requests from federal immigration authorities for the purposes of civil immigration enforcement, except as required by law.(4) State and local law enforcement agencies may not:(a) Inquire into or collect information about an individual's immigration or citizenship status, or place of birth unless there is a connection between such information and an investigation into a violation of state or local criminal law; or(b) Provide information pursuant to notification requests from federal immigration authorities for the purposes of civil immigration enforcement, except as required by law.(5) State and local law enforcement agencies may not provide nonpublicly available personal information about an individual, including individuals subject to community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 and 9.94A.702, to federal immigration authorities in a noncriminal matter, except as required by state or federal law.(6)(a) State and local law enforcement agencies may not give federal immigration authorities access to interview individuals about a noncriminal matter while they are in custody, except as required by state or federal law, a court order, or by (b) of this subsection.(b) Permission may be granted to a federal immigration authority to conduct an interview regarding federal immigration violations with a person who is in the custody of a state or local law enforcement agency if the person consents in writing to be interviewed. In order to obtain consent, agency staff shall provide the person with an oral explanation and a written consent form that explains the purpose of the interview, that the interview is voluntary, and that the person may decline to be interviewed or may choose to be interviewed only with the person's attorney present. The form must state explicitly that the person will not be punished or suffer retaliation for declining to be interviewed. The form must be available at least in English and Spanish and explained orally to a person who is unable to read the form, using, when necessary, an interpreter from the district communications center "language line" or other district resources.(7) An individual may not be detained solely for the purpose of determining immigration status.(8) An individual must not be taken into custody, or held in custody, solely for the purposes of determining immigration status or based solely on a civil immigration warrant, or an immigration hold request.(9)(a) To ensure compliance with all treaty obligations, including consular notification, and state and federal laws, on the commitment or detainment of any individual, state and local law enforcement agencies must explain in writing:(i) The individual's right to refuse to disclose their nationality, citizenship, or immigration status; and(ii) That disclosure of their nationality, citizenship, or immigration status may result in civil or criminal immigration enforcement, including removal from the United States.(b) Nothing in this subsection allows for any violation of subsection (4) of this section.(10) ((A state and local government or law enforcement agency may not deny services, benefits, privileges, or opportunities to individuals in custody, or under community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 and 9.94A.702, or in probation status, on the basis of the presence of an immigration detainer, hold, notification request, or civil immigration warrant, except as required by law or as necessary for classification or placement purposes for individuals in the physical custody of the department of corrections.))In accordance with section 3 of this act, the department of corrections may transfer an incarcerated individual to federal immigration authorities at any time during the person's term of total confinement or community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 and 9.94A.702. (11) No state or local law enforcement officer may enter into any contract, agreement, or arrangement, whether written or oral, that would grant federal civil immigration enforcement authority or powers to state and local law enforcement officers, including but not limited to agreements created under 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1357(g), also known as 287(g) agreements.(12)(a) No state agency or local government or law enforcement officer may enter into an immigration detention agreement. All immigration detention agreements must be terminated no later than one hundred eighty days after May 21, 2019, except as provided in (b) of this subsection.(b) Any immigration detention agreement in effect prior to January 1, 2019, and under which a payment was made between July 1, 2017, and December 31, 2018, may remain in effect until the date of completion or December 31, 2021, whichever is earlier.(13) No state or local law enforcement agency or school resource officer may enter into or renew a contract for the provision of language services from federal immigration authorities, nor may any language services be accepted from such for free or otherwise.(14) The department of corrections may not give federal immigration authorities access to interview individuals about federal immigration violations while they are in custody, except as required by state or federal law or by court order, unless such individuals consent to be interviewed in writing. Before agreeing to be interviewed, individuals must be advised that they will not be punished or suffer retaliation for declining to be interviewed.(15) Subsections (3) through (6) of this section do not apply to individuals who are in the physical custody of the department of corrections.(16) Nothing in this section prohibits the collection, use, or disclosure of information that is:(a) Required to comply with state or federal law; or(b) In response to a lawfully issued court order.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) In accordance with RCW 10.93.160, the department may transfer an incarcerated individual serving a term of total confinement or community custody under the jurisdiction of the department to the custody of federal immigration authorities for an immigration enforcement purpose.(b) The department of corrections may transfer the individual to the custody of the federal government at any time during the person's term of total confinement or community custody on the basis of the presence of an immigration detainer, hold, notification request, or civil immigration warrant.(2) Upon transfer from the jurisdiction of the department to the custody of federal immigration authorities pursuant to this section, the individual's term of total confinement or community custody shall run concurrently while the person is in the custody of federal immigration authorities.(3) For the purposes of this section, the definitions contained in RCW 43.17.420 apply to this section.--- END ---